Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
Article 4 Rescission

13-4-60.
Rescission for fraud.

A contract may be rescinded at the instance of the party defrauded; but, in order to rescind, the defrauded party must promptly, upon discovery of the fraud, restore or offer to restore to the other party whatever he has received by virtue of the contract if it is of any value.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3711; Civil Code 1910, § 4305; Code 1933, § 20-906.

Party must restore benefits with promptitude necessitated by circumstances. —

Party must proceed with offer to restore what one has received with that promptitude which nature of case and environment of circumstances would require, as manifesting intention to treat from discovery of fraud, what one has received as property of other party. Jordy v. Dunlevie, 139 Ga. 325, 77 S.E. 162, 1913 Ga. LEXIS 421 (1913); Manget v. Cunningham, 166 Ga. 71, 142 S.E. 543, 1928 Ga. LEXIS 220 (1928).

Party aggrieved must act with promptitude which nature of case and circumstances require. Chapman v. Telex, Inc., 129 F. Supp. 567, 1954 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 2300 (D. Ga. 1954).

Party defrauded must proceed with the defrauded party’s offer to restore what the party has received, with that promptitude which nature of case and environment of circumstances would require. Newton v. Burks, 139 Ga. App. 617, 229 S.E.2d 94, 1976 Ga. App. LEXIS 2638 (1976); Thomson v. Walter, 160 Ga. App. 542, 287 S.E.2d 562, 1981 Ga. App. LEXIS 3090 (1981).

Patent licensee’s failure to rescind a license agreement

by offering or tendering benefits the licensee received under the contract precluded the licensee’s claim of fraud in the inducement against the licensor. Meadow River Lumber Co. v. University of Ga. Research Found., Inc., 233 Ga. App. 169, 503 S.E.2d 655, 1998 Ga. App. LEXIS 954 (1998), cert. denied, No. S98C1706, 1998 Ga. LEXIS 1179 (Ga. Nov. 20, 1998).

Shareholder was not entitled both to retain the shares and to recover the purchase price,

because to rescind the contract and sue for restitution, the plaintiff must first restore or make a bona fide effort to restore to the other party whatever benefits one has received from the transaction. Graham v. Cook, 179 Ga. App. 603, 347 S.E.2d 623, 1986 Ga. App. LEXIS 1979 (1986).

When no offer to restore benefits received has been made, contract must stand as written.

Ulmer v. Ulmer, 86 Ga. App. 319, 71 S.E.2d 558, 1952 Ga. App. LEXIS 946 (1952).

Contract will not be set aside, on ground of fraud in the contract’s procurement,

at instance of one who has neither restored, nor offered to restore, fruits thereof. Chattanooga Beauty Supply Co. v. Fanin, 61 Ga. App. 736, 7 S.E.2d 302, 1940 Ga. App. LEXIS 245 (1940); Roberts v. Southern Ry., 73 Ga. App. 759, 38 S.E.2d 48, 1946 Ga. App. LEXIS 408 (1946).

Notice of intention to disaffirm is insufficient, there must be offer to restore status.

Jordy v. Dunlevie, 139 Ga. 325, 77 S.E. 162, 1913 Ga. LEXIS 421 (1913).

Offer to restore, made for first time in bill of complaint is insufficient.

Roberts v. Southern Ry., 73 Ga. App. 759, 38 S.E.2d 48, 1946 Ga. App. LEXIS 408 (1946).

13-4-61.
Rights of vendor as to reclamation of goods where contract rescinded for fraud.

Except as otherwise provided in Title 11, the “Uniform Commercial Code,” where a contract of sale is rescinded for fraud, the rights of the vendor reclaiming the goods are superior to those of one who has acquired the goods or a lien thereon in consideration of an antecedent debt.

History.
Civil Code 1895, § 3713; Civil Code 1910, § 4307; Code 1933, § 20-908.

13-4-62.
Rescission for nonperformance.

A party may rescind a contract without the consent of the opposite party on the ground of nonperformance by that party but only when both parties can be restored to the condition in which they were before the contract was made.

History.
Orig. Code 1863, § 2801; Code 1868, § 2809; Code 1873, § 2860; Code 1882, § 2860; Civil Code 1895, § 3712; Civil Code 1910, § 4306; Code 1933, § 20-907.

Party who has substantially broken contract cannot rescind on ground of other’s nonperformance. —

Right to rescind or terminate contract on ground of failure of performance by opposite party belongs only to party who is free from substantial default personally, and a party who has substantially broken contract cannot rescind the contract on ground that other party subsequently refused or failed to perform. Martin v. Rollins, Inc., 138 Ga. App. 649, 226 S.E.2d 771, 1976 Ga. App. LEXIS 2270 (1976), aff'd, 238 Ga. 119, 231 S.E.2d 751, 1977 Ga. LEXIS 918 (1977).

Rescission may be had for inceptive fraud, as well as for subsequent breach of contract.

Head v. Walker, 243 Ga. 108, 252 S.E.2d 440, 1979 Ga. LEXIS 822 (1979).

When equitable action for rescission appropriate.

Head v. Walker, 243 Ga. 108, 252 S.E.2d 440, 1979 Ga. LEXIS 822 (1979).

Rescission of a contract was inappropriate under O.C.G.A. §13-4-62 because the purchasers premised the purchasers’ rescission for nonperformance claim upon the failure of a contingency that acted as a condition precedent in a purchase agreement and the failure to satisfy the condition precedent, that the franchisor would agree to the purchaser’s obtaining the seller’s ice cream store franchise, excused the parties’ obligations and performance under the purchase agreement. Yi v. Li, 313 Ga. App. 273, 721 S.E.2d 144, 2011 Ga. App. LEXIS 1036 (2011), cert. denied, No. S12C0706, 2012 Ga. LEXIS 708 (Ga. Sept. 10, 2012).

Doctrine of rescission is based upon restitution,

and it is only applicable generally where restitution can or ought to be made. This doctrine can have no application to case if one party has acquired nothing which other party is entitled to have restored. Henderson Whse. Co. v. Brand, 105 Ga. 217, 31 S.E. 551, 1898 Ga. LEXIS 484 (1898).

When contract is rescinded, parties are not to be left where rescission finds the paraties;

original status must be restored, or equivalent therefor must be provided in contract or furnished by law. Eller v. McMillan, 174 Ga. 729, 163 S.E. 910, 1932 Ga. LEXIS 126 (1932).

Party electing to rescind must restore or tender benefits received under contract.

Milam v. Gray, 80 Ga. App. 356, 56 S.E.2d 168, 1949 Ga. App. LEXIS 839 (1949).

Section inapplicable to breach of contract to teach. —

Rule of this statute has no application to case when one agrees to each another a certain thing, and, after beginning the course of instruction, refuses to proceed further, whereupon the other party treats the contract as rescinded and brings suit to recover amount which one has paid under agreement. Timmerman v. Stanley, 123 Ga. 850, 51 S.E. 760, 1905 Ga. LEXIS 610 (1905) (see O.C.G.A. §13-4-62).

Ordinary rule of rescission does not apply to accord and satisfaction

because in order for there to be accord and satisfaction, the accord must be executed. As long as accord is executory, although it is partially performed, original cause of action is not extinguished, and action may be brought upon it. Brunswick & W. Ry. v. Clem, 80 Ga. 534, 7 S.E. 84, 1888 Ga. LEXIS 179 (1888).